test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kaavpug_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:




  Noun - kaavpug: # 1B
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Nom: kaavpug
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Gen: kaavpug
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Acc: kaavpug
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Ill: kavpugân
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Loc: kavpugist
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Com: kavpugáin
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Abe: kaavpugttáá
    kaavpug+N+Ess: kavpugin
    kaavpug+N+Par: kavpugid
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Nom: kavpugeh
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Gen: kavpugij
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Acc: kavpugijd
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Ill: kavpugáid
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Loc: kavpugijn
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Com: kavpugijguin
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Abe: kavpugijttáá
